Utah statutes.
57-6-1.   Stay of execution of judgment of possession.

Where an occupant of real estate has color of title to the real estate, and in good faith has made valuable improvements on the real estate, and is afterwards in a proper action found not to be the owner, no execution shall issue to put the owner in possession of the real estate after the filing of a complaint as hereinafter provided, until the provisions of this chapter have been complied with.



Amended by Chapter 299, 1995 General Session

